Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.040

Hearing on petition—Notice.

The board of county commissioners shall set a time for a hearing on the petition for the formation of a park and recreation district to be held not more than sixty days following the receipt of such petition. Notice of hearing shall be given by publication three times, at intervals of not less than one week, in a newspaper of general circulation within the county. Such notice shall state the time and place of hearing and describe particularly the area proposed to be included within the district.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.69.040. Prior: 1957 c 58 s 4.]